Utah statutes.
67-9-1.   Appointment -- Powers.

The state auditor, the state treasurer, the attorney general, and the superintendent of public instruction may each appoint a deputy, who may, during the absence or disability of the principal, perform all the duties pertaining to the office, except those required of the principal as a member of any board. The principal shall be answerable for neglect or misconduct in office of his deputy, and may require from him a bond for his own security. The appointment of a deputy shall be in writing, and shall be revocable at the pleasure of the principal; and all such appointments and revocations shall be filed with the lieutenant governor.



Amended by Chapter 68, 1984 General Session

